New York, session 2025-2026, A9626.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 8-416 of the election law, as 2 amended by chapter 109 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 2. (a) Each board of elections is hereby [authorized] required to 5 establish at least one [or more] ballot drop-off [locations] location as 6 an additional means for the delivery of absentee or early voting ballots 7 marked by a voter to the board of elections of the county or city of the 8 voter's residence. Each such board of elections shall provide notice of 9 the location of every such ballot drop-off location by posting such 10 information on its website no later than the day the ballot drop-off 11 location is established. Nothing in this section shall preclude each 12 board of elections from establishing in its discretion additional ballot 13 drop-off locations as it deems necessary. 14 (b) In the discretion of the board of elections, ballot drop boxes may 15 be placed at public facilities including, but not limited to, town 16 halls, village halls, libraries, and/or county clerks offices. The 17 ballot drop boxes shall be established at least forty-five days before 18 the relevant election. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 20 have become a law and shall apply to elections conducted on and after 21 such effective date. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 22 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 23 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 24 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14383-03-6